Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.210

Limitation of liability.

(1) Obligations incurred by the commission and any other liabilities or claims against the commission are enforceable only against the assets of the commission and, except to the extent of those assets, liability for the debts or actions of the commission does not exist against either the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any member, employee, or agent of the commission or the state of Washington in his or her individual capacity.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, neither the commission members, nor its employees, may be held individually responsible for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. A person or employee may not be held individually responsible for any act or omission of any other commission members. The liability of the commission members is several and not joint, and a member is not liable for the default of any other member. This subsection confirms that commission members have been and continue to be state officers or volunteers for purposes of RCW 4.92.075 and are entitled to the defenses, indemnifications, limitations of liability, and other protections and benefits of chapter 4.92 RCW.

(3) In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any statute, including a rule adopted under that statute, or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, including any action under chapter 19.86 RCW, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a complete defense to such an action or proceeding.

[ 2009 c 33 s 22.]